Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.191

License fees—Expiration—Renewal—Identification cards—Background checks.

Before receiving a license, every real estate broker, managing broker, and firm must pay a license fee as prescribed by the director by rule. A license issued under the provisions of this chapter expires two years from the issuance date. Licenses issued to real estate firms that are partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, and other legally recognized business entities expire on the date when the registration or certificate of authority filed with the secretary of state expires. Licenses must be renewed every two years on or before the date established under this section and a biennial renewal license fee as prescribed by the director by rule must be paid. A license is considered expired when the licensee fails to meet the renewal requirements as of the date of renewal for that license.

If the director does not receive the application for a renewal license on or before the renewal date, a penalty fee as prescribed by the director by rule shall be paid. Acceptance by the director of an application for renewal after the renewal date shall not be a waiver of the delinquency.

The license of a person whose license renewal fee is not received within one year from the date of expiration is canceled. This person may obtain a new license by satisfying the procedures and requirements as prescribed by the director by rule.

The director may issue to each active licensee a license and a pocket identification card in the form and size as prescribed by rule.

The director must develop by rule a procedure and a schedule to ensure all active licensees and licensees applying for active status, renewal, or reinstatement have a fingerprint and background check done on a regular basis.

[ 2008 c 23 s 19; 1997 c 322 s 10; 1991 c 225 s 2; 1989 c 161 s 2; 1987 c 332 s 5; 1979 c 25 s 2. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 370 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 24 s 3; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 12; 1953 c 235 s 7; 1951 c 222 s 12. Formerly: (i) 1947 c 203 s 2, part; 1945 c 111 s 4, part; 1941 c 252 s 12, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-35, part. (ii) 1947 c 203 s 1, part; 1945 c 111 s 3, part; 1943 c 118 s 2, part; 1941 c 252 s 11, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-34, part; prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 ss 10, 11. Formerly RCW 18.85.140.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 161 s 2: "Section 2 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1991." [ 1989 c 161 s 4.]